Louisiana, session 2026, SB425.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:1411(A), (B), (C), and (G) and 1412(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 42:1412(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1411. Public officer; ground for removal; suspension; definitions
A. A public officer except for those officers exempt from removal by suit
as provided in Article X, Section 25 of the Constitution of Louisiana shall be
removed from office for conviction, during his term of office, of a felony or for
malfeasance or gross misconduct while in office as provided in R.S. 42:1412.
B. The conviction for a felony of a public officer or the commission of
malfeasance or gross misconduct of a public officer while in office shall
automatically suspend that individual from his public office without compensation.
The suspension from public office without compensation shall continue until the
conviction is final and all appellate review of the original trial court proceedings is
exhausted. During the period of suspension, the public official shall not perform any
official act, duty, or function nor shall he receive any compensation, pay, allowance,
emolument, or privilege of his office. If the conviction is reversed on appeal, the
public official shall be entitled to and shall receive full back pay with legal interest
thereon from the date of suspension, compensation, and all rights, duties, powers,
allowances, emoluments, and privileges of office to which he would have been
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 425 ENROLLED
entitled had he not been suspended.
C. During this period of suspension, another person shall be appointed to
perform the official acts, duties, and functions of that office during the period of
suspension. Any person appointed to perform these official acts, duties, and
functions shall serve in his appointed capacity until the determination of
malfeasance or gross misconduct or the conviction of the public official is
overturned or reversed on appeal or until expiration of the term of office of the
suspended public official, whichever occurs first. Every person appointed under the
provisions of this Section shall receive the same pay, compensation, allowances,
emoluments, and privileges of the office to which he is appointed as the suspended
public official received prior to his suspension.
* * *
G. For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall apply:
(1) the term "felony" "Felony" includes both a felony under the laws of this
state and a felony under the laws of the United States.
(2) For purposes of this Chapter, the term "public "Public officer" means any
person holding a public office, whether state, district, parochial, ward, or municipal,
whether the person is elected or appointed except judges of the courts of record.
(3) "Malfeasance" means any of the conduct described in R.S. 14:134(A).
(4) "Gross misconduct" means the willful, knowing, or recklessly
indifferent act or omission by a public official, committed in office or under
color of office, that: (a) constitutes a serious abuse or misuse of official power
or authority; (b) materially violates the law, the oath of office, or established
ethical duties; or (c) substantially undermines the integrity, functioning, or
public trust of the office; and that is of such gravity that it renders the official
unfit to continue in office.
* * *
§1412. Method for removal
A.(1) For conviction of a felony any public officer shall be removed by
judgment of the district court of the district in which he is domiciled. The district
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 425 ENROLLED
attorney of that judicial district shall institute the suit within ten days after the
conviction is final and all appellate review of the original trial court proceedings is
exhausted. Suits against the attorney general shall be brought in the Nineteenth
Judicial District by the district attorney of that district, and suits against a district
attorney shall be brought by the attorney general.
(2) For commission of malfeasance or gross misconduct while in office
a public official shall be removed by judgment of the district court in the parish
of the official's domicile or the parish where the conduct occurred. A suit to
remove a public official pursuant to this Section may be brought by the attorney
general or by either house of the legislature pursuant to the provisions of
Subsection E of this Section.
* * *
E.(1) A public official shall be removed from office upon a final judicial
determination proven by clear and convincing evidence that the public official
has committed malfeasance or gross misconduct while in office. This proceeding
shall be brought in the parish in which the official is domiciled or the parish
where the conduct of malfeasance or gross misconduct occurred.
(2) Any action pursuant to this Subsection shall be civil in nature, subject
to the provisions of Subsection C of this Section, with venue in the parish of the
official's domicile or the parish where the conduct occurred.
(3) The attorney general may initiate an action under this Subsection
only upon an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the elected members of either
house of the legislature authorizing the attorney general to file the action
against a public official, which vote may be procured by written ballot.
(4) Either house of the legislature may initiate an action under this
Subsection only upon a two-thirds vote of the elected members of that house,
which vote may be procured by written ballot. The action shall be brought in
the name of the presiding officer of the house voting to initiate the action.
(5) The supreme court shall appoint an ad hoc judge approved by a
majority of the court to preside over any action initiated under this Subsection.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 425 ENROLLED
(6) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to limit the authority
of the attorney general to institute a suit to remove a public officer while in
office under the provisions of Subsection A of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.